th: ประเภทพวยกา: แข็ง; นุ่ม; ฟาง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta dude: Trdna; Mehka; Slamica; Drugo
zh-CN: 喷口类型: 硬; 软; 稻草; 其他
it: Tipo di beccuccio: Dura; Morbida; Paglia; Altro
hu: Kifolyó típusa: Kemény; Puha; Szalma; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de arejador: Duro; Macio; Canudo; Outro
fi: Kourutyyppi: Kova; Pehmeä; Olki; Muu
ru: Тип носика: Жесткий; Мягкий; Соломенный; Другое
ko: 스파우트 유형: 하드; 부드러움; 빨대; 기타
ja: 注ぎ口の種類: ハード; ソフト; ストロー; その他
da: Tudtype: Hård; Blød; Strå; Andet
fr: Type de bec: Difficile; Doux; Paille; Autre
vi: Loại vòi: Cứng; Mềm; Rơm rạ; Khác
de: Schnabeltyp: Hart; Weich; Stroh; Sonstiges
sv: Piptyp: Hård; Mjuk; Strå; Övrigt
cs: Typ uzávěru: Tvrdá; Měkká; Sláma; Jiné
ro-RO: Tip gură de scurgere: Dur; Moale; Paie; Altele
es: Tipo de boquilla: Duro; Blando; Paja; Otros
nl: Tuittype: Hard; Zacht; Rietje; Andere
lt-LT: Snapelio tipas: Kietas; Minkštas; Šiaudelis; Kita
bg-BG: Тип чучур: Твърд; Мек; Сламка; Други
el: Τύπος στομίου: Σκληρή; Μαλακό; Άχυρο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ násadky na hrnček: Tvrdý; Mäkký; Slamka; Iné
pl: Typ wylewki: Twardy; Miękki; Słoma; Inne
nb: Tuttype: Hard; Myk; Strå; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta usnika: Tvrdi; Meki; Slamka; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de tetinas: Duro; Suave; Canudo; Outro
tr: Meme Ucu Tipi: Sert; Yumuşak; Saman; Diğer
en: Spout type: Hard; Soft; Straw; Other
zh-TW: 噴嘴類型: 硬; 柔軟; 稻草; 其他